Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB649.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4704(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4704. Inspection by police or Commonwealth personnel.* * *(b) Notice of violation.--Any police officer or qualified Commonwealth employee, having probable cause to believe that any vehicle or mass transit vehicle, regardless of whether it is being operated, or its equipment, documents or load, are unsafe, not equipped as required, or are otherwise not in compliance with the law or department regulations, may at any time submit a written notice of the violations to the driver of the vehicle or the mass transit vehicle or to the owner, lessee or registrant, or if none of them is present, to an adult occupant of the 123456789101112131415161718 vehicle or the mass transit vehicle, or if the vehicle or the mass transit vehicle is unoccupied, the notice shall be attached to the vehicle or the mass transit vehicle in a conspicuous place.(1) The notice shall specify the particulars of the violations and require that the violations be corrected. Within [five] 15 days or, in the case of a motor carrier vehicle or bus, within] 15 days or before commencement of the vehicle's next trip, whichever occurs first, or in the case of emission testing, within 30 days, evidence must be submitted to the police or the Commonwealth, whichever is applicable, that the violations have been corrected.(2) If the police officer or qualified Commonwealth employee has probable cause to believe that a vehicle or mass transit vehicle is unsafe or not in proper repair or fails a roadside vehicle emission test, he may require in the written notice that the vehicle or mass transit vehicle be inspected. The owner or driver shall,[ within [five] 15 days of the date of notification or, in the case of a motor carrier vehicle or bus,] within 15 days of the date of notification or before commencement of the vehicle's next trip, whichever occurs first, or in the case of emission testing, within 30 days, submit to the police or the Commonwealth, whichever is applicable, certification from an official inspection station that the vehicle or the mass transit vehicle has been restored to legal operating condition in relation to the particulars specified on the notice. Any person who fails a roadside vehicle emission inspection shall have 30 days in which to pass an enhanced vehicle emission inspection or to produce evidence that the subject vehicle has a valid 20250HB0649PN2095 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emissions test waiver.(3) After the expiration of the [five-day,] 15-day or 30-day period specified in paragraphs (1) and (2), whichever is appropriate, the vehicle shall not be operated upon the highways of this Commonwealth and a mass transit vehicle shall not be operated until the owner or driver has submitted to the police or the Commonwealth, whichever is applicable, evidence of compliance with the requirements of paragraph (1) or (2), whichever is applicable.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0649PN2095 - 3 - 1234567891011